Massachusetts, session 194th, S2189.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 15ZZZZZZ, the following section:-
Section 15AAAAAAA. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart
September 22nd as Military Service Members and Veterans Suicide Awareness and
Remembrance Day, in recognition and in honor of fallen service members and veterans and their
families, to acknowledge that suicide among service members and veterans is an epidemic, to
foster awareness of suicide among service members and veterans, and to call for suicide
prevention measures for service members and veterans, and thereby to support the service
members and veterans who dedicate their lives to protect and to serve our country, and shall
recommend that the day be observed in an appropriate manner by the people of the
Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
of 1